Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.079

Competency to stand trial—Continuation of competency process, dismissal of charges—Exceptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) If the issue of competency to stand trial is raised by the court or a party under RCW 10.77.060, the prosecutor may continue with the competency process or dismiss the charges without prejudice and refer the defendant for assessment by a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, co-occurring disorder specialist, or developmental disabilities professional to determine the appropriate service needs for the defendant.

(2) This section does not apply to defendants with a current charge or prior conviction for a violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a violation of RCW 9A.36.031(1) (d), (f), or (h).

[ 2019 c 444 s 8; 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.